Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-6,100.06
Joint city-county building; annual budget of city and county.

The county and the city of the first class shall each provide in their annual budgets an item for their proportion of the expense of maintaining such joint city-county building.

Laws 1953, c. 32, § 6, p. 122.